Utah statutes.
4-3-5.   Authority to collect samples -- Receipt -- Names of distributors.
(1) Samples of dairy products from each dairy farm or processing plant may be
secured and examined as often as deemed necessary by the department.
(2)  Samples of dairy products from stores, cafes, soda fountains,
restaurants, and other places where dairy products are sold may be secured and
examined as often as deemed necessary by the department.
(3)  Samples of milk or dairy products may be taken by the department at any
time before final delivery to the consumer.
(4)  The department shall provide a signed receipt for all samples taken
showing the date of sampling and the amount and kind of sample taken;
provided, that the department is not liable to any person for the cost of any
sample taken.
(5)  All proprietors of stores, cafes, restaurants, soda fountains, and other
similar places shall furnish the department, upon request, with the names of
all distributors from whom dairy products are obtained.
